District of Columbia statutes.
8-1501

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Disposal” means the permanent isolation of low-level radioactive waste as a regional disposal facility as defined in section 2 of the Low-level Radioactive Waste Policy Act, approved December 23, 1980 (94 Stat. 3347; 42 U.S.C. § 2021b) (“Waste Policy Act”).

(2)

“Generator” means any public or private individual, institution, corporation, association, group, or other legally constituted enterprise that produces low-level radioactive waste in the District of Columbia (“District”).

(3)

“Low-level radioactive waste (‘waste’)” means radioactive material that:

(A)

Is not high-level radioactive waste, spent nuclear fuel, transuranic waste, or byproduct material as defined in section 11e of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, approved August 30, 1954 (68 Stat. 923; 42 U.S.C. § 2014(e)); and

(B)

The United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission has classified, consistent with 10 C.F.R. 61.55, as low-level radioactive waste.

(4)

“Regional facility” means a low-level radioactive waste disposal facility in operation on January 1, 1985, or subsequently established and operated pursuant to the Waste Policy Act.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-226, § 2, 38 DCR 219
1981 Ed., § 6-3701.
The definition of low-level radioactive waste disposal facility in the Waste Policy Act, referred to in (4), is codified at 42 U.S.C. 2021b(11).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-226, the “District of Columbia Low-level Radioactive Waste Generator Regulatory Policy Act of 1990”, see Mayor’s Order 94-102, April 28, 1994 ( 41 DCR 2523).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-226, the “District of Columbia Low-Level Radioactive Waste Generator Regulatory Policy Act of 1990”, see Mayor’s Order 98-52, April 15, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2698).